miscellaneous/latin-verbs.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Verb +PresInd +Act +1P +2P +3P +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
cant    AreV ;
laud    AreV ;
am      AreV;

LEXICON AreV
o+Verb:0 AreConj ;

LEXICON AreConj
ArePresIndicAct ;

LEXICON ArePresIndicAct
+PresInd+Act:0 ArePresIndicEnd ;

LEXICON ArePresIndicEnd
+1P+Sg:0    # ;
+2P+Sg:as   # ;
+3P+Sg:at   # ;

+1P+Pl:amus # ;
+2P+Pl:atis # ;
+3P+Pl:ant  # ;
